Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,221
State Claims Board; rules and regulations; adopt.

The State Claims Board shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the State Tort Claims Act.

Laws 1969, c. 756, § 13, p. 2850;

Laws 1988, LB 864, § 32.